Wyoming, session 2026, HB0086.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 18-3-902(a) is amended to read:

18-3-902. Governor to direct district attorney or
attorney general to commence action; petition served with
summons; pleading; trial; judgment; change of judge.

(a) Whenever it appears to the governor based on the
a verified complaint of qualified electors or the board of
county commissioners of the county submitted under this
HB0086

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0251
subsection that any county officer is guilty of misconduct
or malfeasance in office, he the governor may direct the
attorney general to commence and prosecute an action in the
district court of the county in which the officer is an
official asking for the removal of the officer. The action
shall be commenced by the filing of a verified petition in
the name of the state of Wyoming signed by the attorney
general setting forth the facts constituting the misconduct
or malfeasance in office. The following persons may submit
a verified complaint to the governor against a county
officer under this subsection alleging misconduct or
malfeasance in office:

(i) A qualified elector in the county;

(ii) The board of county commissioners of the
county;

(iii) The secretary of state if the complaint is
against a county clerk and the alleged misconduct or
malfeasance in office is for a violation of the Wyoming
Election Code of 1973, as amended.

HB0086

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0251
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0086